class-I/I1.foma
### sinhalaC1.foma ###

read lexc I1.lexc
define Lexicon;




define B [ි ත  ි|  ි ත ් ව ා | ු | ි න ් |  ි ල ් ල ා | ි ම ි | ි ම ු | ි ම ි ව ා  |  ි ම ු ව ා |ි ය ි | ි ව ු | ි ම ි න ්| ු ල ැ බ ූ |ි ද ් ද ී];    

define C [න];
define D [ු ණ ු | ූ | ු ව ෙ ම ි | ු ව ෙ ම ු | ු ව ෙ හ ි | ු ව ෙ හ ු | ු ව ා ය |  ු ව ේ ය | ු ව ෝ ​ ය | ේ | ෙ ම ි | ෙ ම ු | ෙ හ ි | ෙ හ ු | ෙ ය ි| ෙ ත ි | ව ෙ ය ි | ව ෙ ත ි | ව ේ ];



######### Rewrite rules

define CIRule1  ් -> 0 || _ "^" [B | C | D] ;
define CIRule2  න -> 0 || _ "^" C ;
define CIRule3  [..] -> ෙ || _ "^" C ;
define CIRule4 [..] -> ැ || ග _ න "^" D ;

# To Cleanup: remove morpheme boundaries
define Cleanup "^" -> 0;

define D1Grammar 	Lexicon .o.
		CIRule1		.o.
		CIRule2		.o.
              	CIRule3		.o.
		CIRule4		.o.
		Cleanup;

regex D1Grammar;
